Illinois, session 104th, HB2489.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-5a.2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5a.2 new)7    Sec. 5-5a.2. Community day services billing for adults 8with intellectual and developmental disabilities. The 9Department shall file an amendment to the Home and 10Community-Based Services Waiver Program for Adults with 11Developmental Disabilities authorized under Section 1915(c) of 12the Social Security Act that removes the 5 hour per day billing 13maximums placed on providers of community day services. The 14amendment shall not modify monthly and yearly billing maximums 15for providers of community day services. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 171, 2026.